Massachusetts, session 194th, H2311.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40 of the general laws, is hereby amended by adding the following
new section:
SECTION 2. There shall be a special commission to study the streamlining of municipal
licenses for businesses. The commission shall consist of the following members, the chairs of the
joint Community Development and Small Businesses, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 member
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the
minority leader of the senate; the secretary of housing and economic development or a designee;
1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Municipal Association; 1 member appointed by the
Retailers Association of Massachusetts; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts chapter of the
national federation of independent businesses; and 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts
Restaurant Association.
of 2

The commission shall hold at least three public hearings and shall solicit input from the
public, and businesses on the process of municipal licensing for businesses and ways to
streamline processes and procedures. The commission shall submit a report to the legislature on
its findings and any legislative recommendations to update the laws of the commonwealth by
March 1, 2027.
of 2